Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5932.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11a. (1) If, after the department issues a building permit or an additional permit, the holder of the building permit or additional permit, as applicable, requests to make changes to the building permit or additional permit, the department may require additional changes to the building permit or additional permit, subject to all of the following conditions: (a) The department's additional changes must not provide for any new or additional requirements that are unrelated to the changes that the holder of the permit requests to make. (b) The department must not readdress any portion of the building permit or additional permit that the department examined and approved under section 11. (c) The department must notify the holder of the permit of the department's requested changes not later than 10 days after receipt of the request for changes from the holder of the permit. The department must not require any additional changes to the application for a building permit or an additional permit after that time period. (2) A request to make changes to a building permit or an additional permit under this section does not restart the application process for the permit. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5933. (b) House Bill No. 5934. (c) House Bill No. 5935.